Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6214
Professional license, defined.

Professional license shall mean an individual nontransferable authorization to work in a health profession based on qualifications which include graduation from an accredited or approved program and acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of examinations.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 14.